Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 30 Distribution of Credit Cards

6-30-1.
Solicitation by mail.

No person engaged in the business of granting or extending credit by the use of a credit card shall mail any credit card to any individual unless the individual shall have previously made a request, in writing or verbally, for any credit card.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 337, § 1.

6-30-2.
“Credit card” defined.

As used in this chapter, “credit card” means any instrument or device, whether known as a credit card, credit plate, or by any other name, issued with or without fee by an issuer for the use of the cardholder in obtaining money, goods, services, or anything else of value on credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 177, § 1.

6-30-3.
Exceptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to:

The issuance of any credit card to any individual who shall at the time of the issuance have a credit account relationship with the issuer.

The issuance of any credit card to any individual whose credit account shall have been transferred to the issuer by any other person engaged in the business of granting or extending credit by the use of a credit card.

The renewal of any credit card previously issued that has been used by the cardholder during the previous new or renewal term.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 22.

6-30-4.
Penalty for violation.

Anyone who violates any provision of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Any person, firm, or corporation who or that has been found guilty of violating any provision of this chapter or any person, firm, or corporation acquiring derivative rights from someone found guilty shall be prohibited from maintaining any civil action for the recovery of any debt created through the use of the credit card.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 22.

6-30-5.
Verbal applications for credit cards.

Persons engaged in the business of granting or extending credit by use of credit card may take a request, verbally or in writing, for any credit card.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 337, § 2.

6-30-6.
Credit card transactions — Printing of accounting numbers on receipts.

As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Cardholder” means the person named on the face of a credit card to whom or for whose benefit the credit card is issued by an issuer and shall include any employee or other agent or authorized user of the card;

“Credit card” shall be defined as stated in §

6-30-2

;

“Issuer” means the financial institution or other business organization that issues a credit card or its duly authorized agent;

“Person” means an individual or corporation, partnership, trust, association, joint-venture pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, unincorporated organization, or any other legal entity; and

“Provider” means a person who furnishes money, goods, services, or anything else of value upon presentation, whether physically, in writing, verbally, electronically, or otherwise of a credit card by the cardholder, or any agent or employee of such person.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no provider shall print or otherwise produce or reproduce or permit the printing or other production or reproduction of either of the following:

Any part of the credit card account number, other than the last five (5) digits or other characters on any receipt provided or made available to the cardholder; or

The credit card expiration date on any receipt provided or made available to the cardholder.

This section shall not apply to a credit card transaction in which the sole means available to the provider of recording the credit card account number is by handwriting or by imprint of the card.

This section shall not apply to receipts issued for transactions on the electronic benefits transfer card system.

Any cardholder whose credit card has been the subject of a violation of this section, or the issuer of such a card, may bring a civil action in the superior court against the provider who violated the provisions of this section to recover or obtain one or all of the following remedies:

Damages or expenses, or both, that the cardholder or issuer incurred due to the provider’s violation of this section;

Court costs, including reasonable attorneys’ fees;

Injunctive or equitable relief, as appropriate; and

Any other relief the court deems proper.

The provisions of this section shall become effective on January 1, 2007, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for credit card transactions that is in use prior to January 1, 2005.

The provisions of this section shall become effective on January 1, 2005, with respect to any cash register or other machine or device that electronically prints receipts for credit card transactions that is first put into use on or after January 1, 2005.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 238, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 22.